California statutes. Vehicle Code
(3) The certificate to drive an ambulance shall be valid for a period not exceeding five years and six months and shall expire on the same date as the driver’s license. The ambulance driver certificate shall only be valid when both of the following conditions exist:

(A) The certificate is accompanied by a medical examination certificate that was issued within the preceding two years and approved by the department, the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, or the Federal Aviation Administration.

(B) A copy of the medical examination report based upon which the certificate was issued is on file with the department.

(4) The ambulance driver certificate is renewable under conditions prescribed by the department. Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and
 (3) of subdivision (d), an applicant renewing an ambulance driver certificate shall possess certificates or licenses evidencing compliance with the emergency medical training and educational standards for ambulance attendants established by the Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(d) (1) Every ambulance driver shall have been trained to assist the ambulance attendant in the care and handling of the ill and injured.

Except as provided in paragraph (2), the driver of a California-based ambulance shall, within one year of initial issuance of the driver’s ambulance driver certificate, possess a certificate or license evidencing compliance with the emergency medical training and educational standards established for ambulance attendants by the Emergency Medical Services Authority. In those emergencies requiring both the regularly assigned driver and attendant to be utilized in
 providing patient care, the specialized emergency medical training requirement shall not apply to persons temporarily detailed to drive the ambulance.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to an ambulance driver who is a volunteer driver for a volunteer ambulance service if the service is provided in the unincorporated areas of a county with a population of less than 125,000 persons, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census. The operation of an ambulance subject to this paragraph shall only apply if the name of the driver and the volunteer ambulance service and facts substantiating the public health necessity for an exemption are submitted to the department by the county board of supervisors and at least one of the following entities in the county where the driver operates the ambulance:

(A) The county health officer.

(B) The county medical care committee.

(C) The local emergency medical services agency coordinator.

(3) The information required by paragraph (2) shall be submitted to the department at the time of application for an ambulance driver certificate. Upon receipt of that information, the department shall restrict the certificate holder to driving an ambulance for the volunteer ambulance service.

(4) The director may terminate any certificate issued pursuant to paragraph (2) at any time the department determines that the qualifying conditions specified no longer exist.

(5) The exemption granted pursuant to paragraph (2) shall expire on the expiration date of the ambulance driver certificate.

(e) An ambulance certificate is not required for persons operating ambulances in the line of duty as salaried, regular, full-time police officers, deputy sheriffs, members of a fire department of a public agency, or members of a fire department of a federally recognized tribe. This exemption excludes volunteers and part-time employees or members of a department whose duties are primarily clerical or administrative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 282, Sec. 4.   (AB 798)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Student Licenses [12650. - 12661.]

12650.

(a) Any student over 15 years of age taking a course in automobile driver training, maintained pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 41900) of Chapter 5 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, in a secondary school or enrolled in a driver training course offered by a private or parochial school of secondary level may apply to the principal of the school for a student license.

(b) The application shall be signed by the applicant before the principal of the
 school, or a staff member assigned to such duty. The application shall be accompanied by a statement signed by the parents or guardian or person having custody of the minor, consenting to the issuance of a student license to the student and accepting liability for civil damages arising out of the student driving a motor vehicle upon a highway as provided for in Division 9 (commencing with Section 17000) of this code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, if the person or persons required to sign a statement consenting to the issuance of a student license and accepting liability as provided in subdivision (b) are not residents of this state and the student resides at the school, or the student is a foster child with no parents or guardian available to sign this statement, the application may be accepted if the principal of the school or staff member assigned such duties certifies that the school has filed with the department a
 certificate of insurance carrier or surety company that there is in effect a policy or bond meeting the requirements of Section 16056, and that such policy or bond will cover the liability for civil damages arising out of the student driving a motor vehicle upon a highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

12651.

The principal or staff member assigned such duty may issue or reissue a student license without cost whenever in his opinion the applicant is qualified to take the course of instruction and has filed a proper application therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

12652.

A student license shall limit the operation of a motor vehicle to such times as the licensee is taking driver training in connection with the driver education program and then only at the direction and under the supervision of the instructor and shall be valid only for the period covered by the course and for not more than one year from the date of issuance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12653.

A student license may be canceled by the principal of the school or by the department whenever, in the opinion of either, the safety of the licensee or other persons requires the action and shall be canceled upon the written request of the parent or other person who signed the consent to issue the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

12660.

(a) The department may establish a program authorizing a driving school licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5 to issue a student license to operate a class 3 vehicle to any applicant 15 years of age or older, subject to the conditions specified in subdivision (d).

(b) The department may charge any driving school participating in the program a fee not to exceed two dollars ($2) per
 applicant to recover the department’s cost in establishing and monitoring the program. The fee that a participating school may charge an applicant for a student license may not exceed the fee that the department charges the school for the license.

(c) The department may remove a driving school from the program if the department determines that the school has issued a student license fraudulently, or has otherwise not followed the requirements of the program. This fraudulent conduct may result in cause for suspension or revocation of the driving school license.

(d) (1) Applicants shall meet the qualification standards specified in regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 12661. The student license application shall be accompanied by a statement signed by the parents or guardian, or person having custody of the minor, consenting to the issuance
 of a student license to the applicant.

(2) No licensed driving school may issue a student license to any applicant under the age of 17 years and 6 months unless that applicant shows proof of satisfactory completion of an approved course in driver education, pursuant to standards specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.

(e) A driving school owner or an independent instructor licensed under Section 11105.5 shall maintain liability insurance for bodily injury or property damage caused by the use of a motor vehicle in driving instruction, and for the liability of the driving school, the instructor, and the student, in accordance with Section 11103.

(f) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature on the progress of the program established under subdivision (a) within two years after
 the program is implemented. The report shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of the costs and benefits of the program and shall include recommendations by the department.

(g) The director may terminate the program at any time the department determines that continued operation of the program would have an adverse effect on traffic safety. The finding upon which the termination is based shall be reported to the Legislature within 30 days following termination of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 768, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12661.

The department, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall adopt regulations for the issuance of student licenses pursuant to Section 12660. The department and the State Department of Education shall seek advice and input on those regulations from the public, law enforcement, and the driving school industry. The regulations shall include all of the following:

(a) Standards and procedures for the issuance of student licenses pursuant to Section 12660, including the
 determination of an applicant’s qualifications under Section 12805.

(b) Standards and procedures to ensure that all records of a driving school relating to the physical or mental condition of any student are confidential, except to the department.

(c) Standards and procedures for monitoring the issuance of student licenses. 

(d) A requirement that each student license issued pursuant to Section 12660 be accompanied by a verbal and written description of the limitations of that license in terms of duration and use.

(e) Any other requirements necessary to carry out Section 12660.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1029, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issuance and Renewal of Licenses [12800. - 12819.]

12800.

Each application for an original or a renewal of a driver’s license shall contain all of the following information:

(a) (1) The applicant’s true full name, age, gender category, mailing address, residence address, and, except as provided in Section 12801, social security account number.

(2) The applicant shall choose their gender category of female, male, or nonbinary.

(3) The department shall not require documentation for an original driver’s license applicant’s initial choice of a gender category or a licensed applicant’s request for an amendment to a gender category other than the following:

(A) The applicant’s self-certification of their chosen gender category.

(B) Documentation required by this code and the California Code of Regulations as necessary to establish that an applicant is lawfully entitled to a license.

(b) A brief description of the applicant for the purpose of identification.

(c) A legible print of the thumb or finger of the applicant.

(d) The type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires to operate.

(e) Whether the applicant has ever previously been licensed as a driver and, if so, when and in what state or country and whether or not the license has been suspended or revoked
 and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension or revocation.

(f) Whether the applicant has ever previously been refused a driver’s license in this state and, if so, the date of and the reason for the refusal.

(g) Whether the applicant, within the last three years, has experienced, on one or more occasions, either a lapse of consciousness or an episode of marked confusion caused by a condition that may bring about recurrent lapses, or whether the applicant has a disease, disorder, or disability that affects the applicant’s ability to exercise reasonable and ordinary control in operating a motor vehicle upon a highway.

(h) Whether the applicant understands traffic signs and signals.

(i) Whether the applicant has ever previously been issued an
 identification card by the department.

(j) Any other information that is necessary to enable the department to determine whether the applicant is entitled to a license under this code.

(k) (1) Commencing January 1, 2027, a statement informing the person that they may also need to change their address for purposes of their vehicle registration.

(2) The information described in paragraph (1) shall be given to the person orally if the driver’s license application or renewal is done in person.

(l) The department shall adopt regulations to provide a process for an amendment to a gender category.

(m) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(n) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its internet website.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 853, Sec. 16) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 1.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions, if a judicial determination as described in subd. (n) has not taken effect.    Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (n).    If a judicial determination as described in subd. (n) takes effect on or after January 1, 2019, see the later operative section amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2022, of Ch. 969.)
-------------------------------------------

12800.

Each application for an original or a renewal of a driver’s license shall contain all of the following information:

(a) (1) The applicant’s true full name, age, gender category, mailing address, residence address, and social security account number.

(2) The applicant shall choose their gender category of female, male, or nonbinary.

(3) The department shall not require documentation for an original driver’s license applicant’s initial choice of a gender category or a licensed applicant’s request for an amendment to a gender category other than the following:

(A) The
 applicant’s self-certification of their chosen gender category.

(B) Documentation required by this code and the California Code of Regulations as necessary to establish that an applicant is lawfully entitled to a license.

(b) A brief description of the applicant for the purpose of identification.

(c) A legible print of the thumb or finger of the applicant, which has been confirmed by the department to be on file prior to issuance of a driver’s license.

(d) The type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires to operate.

(e) Whether the applicant has ever previously been licensed as a driver and, if so, when and in what state or country and whether or not the license
 has been suspended or revoked and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension or revocation.

(f) Whether the applicant has ever previously been refused a driver’s license in this state and, if so, the date of and the reason for the refusal.

(g) Whether the applicant, within the last three years, has experienced, on one or more occasions, either a lapse of consciousness or an episode of marked confusion caused by a condition that may bring about recurrent lapses, or whether the applicant has a disease, disorder, or disability that affects their ability to exercise reasonable and ordinary control in operating a motor vehicle upon a highway.

(h) Whether the applicant understands traffic signs and signals.

(i) Whether the applicant has ever previously
 been issued an identification card by the department.

(j) Any other information that is necessary to enable the department to determine whether the applicant is entitled to a license under this code.

(k) (1) Commencing January 1, 2027, a statement informing the person that they may also need to change their address for purposes of their vehicle registration.

(2) The information described in paragraph (1) shall be given to the person orally if the driver’s license application or renewal is done in person.

(l) The department shall adopt regulations to provide a process for an amendment to a gender category.

(m) This section shall become operative on the effective
 date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its internet website.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 254, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   This section, pursuant to its own provisions, becomes operative if a judicial determination as described in subd. (m) has taken effect.)
-------------------------------------------

12800.5.

(a) (1) A license shall bear a fullface engraved picture or photograph of the licensee.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not, unless requested by the licensee, distribute or sell the licensee’s picture or photograph or any information pertaining to the licensee’s physical characteristics to any private individual, other than the licensee, or to any firm, copartnership, association, or corporation. This paragraph does not apply to
 a private business entity that contracts with the department for the production of driver’s licenses and identification cards, if the contract prohibits the unauthorized use and disclosure of the information.

(b) (1) A license, including a temporary license issued pursuant to Section 12506, shall bear the following notice: “This license is issued as a license to drive a motor vehicle; it does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.”

(2) In the next scheduled revision of the driver’s license on or after January 1, 2023, the notice specified in paragraph (1) shall be replaced by the
 following notice requirement:

(A) A Real ID driver’s license, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the license is issued as a license to drive a motor vehicle, and that it does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.

(B) A driver’s license that is not a Real ID driver’s license, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the license is issued as a license to drive a motor vehicle, it does not establish eligibility for employment, firearms purchases, voter registration, or public benefits, and that it is not acceptable for official federal purposes.

(c) The department may demand proof of age prior to the issuance of a license.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the driver’s license has been revised to include the notices specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and is repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 7.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

12800.5.

(a) (1) A license shall bear a fullface engraved picture or photograph of the licensee.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not, unless requested by the licensee, distribute or sell the licensee’s picture or photograph or any information pertaining to the licensee’s physical characteristics to any private individual, other than the licensee, or to any firm, copartnership, association, or corporation. This paragraph does not apply to a private business entity that contracts with the department for the production of driver’s licenses and identification cards, if the contract prohibits the unauthorized use and disclosure of the information.

(b) (1) A Real ID driver’s license, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the license is issued as a license to drive a motor vehicle, and that it does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.

(2) A driver’s license that is not a Real ID driver’s license, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the license is issued as a license to drive a motor vehicle, it does not establish eligibility for employment, firearms purchases, voter registration, or public benefits, and that it is not acceptable for official federal purposes.

(c) The department may demand proof of age prior to the issuance of a license.

(d) This section shall become operative on the date
 the department notifies the Legislature that the driver’s license has been revised to include the notices specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 8.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12800.6.

(a) An application for an original, renewal, or duplicate of a driver’s license shall inform the applicant of the Department of Justice’s video on proper conduct during a traffic stop created pursuant to Section 1656.1.

(b) The information
 in subdivision (a) shall be included upon the next scheduled revision of the driver’s license application subsequent to the release of the Department of Justice’s video on proper conduct during a traffic stop created pursuant to Section 1656.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 332, Sec. 4.   (AB 2537)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12800.7.

(a) Upon application for an original, renewal, or duplicate of a driver’s license the department may require the applicant to produce any identification that it determines is necessary in order to ensure that the name of the applicant stated in the application is their true, full name and that their residence address as set forth in the application is
 their true residence address.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any document provided by the applicant to the department for purposes of proving the applicant’s identity, true, full name, California residency, or that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, is not a public record and shall not be disclosed by the department except in response to a subpoena for individual records in a criminal proceeding or a court order, or in response to a law enforcement request to address an urgent health or safety need if the law enforcement agency certifies in writing the specific circumstances that do not permit authorities time to obtain a court order. Immigration enforcement, as defined in Section 7284.4 of the Government Code, does not constitute an urgent health and safety need for purposes of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 9.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) and Section 12801.9, the department shall require an application for a driver’s license to contain the applicant’s social security account number and any other number or identifier determined to be appropriate by the department.

(b) An applicant who provides satisfactory proof that his or her presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, but who is not eligible for a social security account number, is eligible to receive an original driver’s license if he or she meets all other qualifications for licensure.

(c) (1) An applicant applying for a driver’s license under Section 12801.9, who has never been issued a social security account number and is not presently eligible for a social security account number, shall satisfy the requirements of this section if he or she indicates in the application described in Section 12800, in the manner prescribed by the department, that he or she has never been issued a social security account number and is not presently eligible for a social security account number.

(2) This
 subdivision does not apply to applications for a commercial driver’s license. The department shall require all applications for a commercial driver’s license to include the applicant’s social security account number.

(3) This section shall not be used to consider an individual’s citizenship or immigration status as a basis for a criminal investigation, arrest, or detention.

(d) The department shall not complete an application for a driver’s license unless the applicant is in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the social security account number collected on a driver’s license application shall not be displayed on the driver’s license, including, but not limited to, inclusion on a magnetic tape or strip used to store data on the license.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015, or on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 12801.11, whichever is sooner.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its Internet Web site.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 27, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 537.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (g).   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 171 of Stats. 2014, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall require an application for a driver’s license to contain the applicant’s social security account number and any other number or identifier determined to be appropriate by the department.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an applicant who provides satisfactory proof that his or her presence in the United States is authorized under federal
 law, but who is not eligible for a social security account number, is eligible to receive an original driver’s license if he or she meets all other qualifications for licensure.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the social security account number collected on a driver’s license application shall not be displayed on the driver’s license, including, but not limited to, inclusion on a magnetic tape or strip used to store data on the license.

(d) This section shall become operative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its Internet Web site.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 524, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 171.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.2.

(a) A person shall not receive financial compensation for the sole purpose of filling out an original driver’s license application for another person.

(b) A person in violation of this section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each offense. Actions for relief pursuant to this section
 may be commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General, or by the district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney of the location in which the violation occurred.

(c) Section 40000.1 does not apply to a violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   (AB 852)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.5.

(a) Except as provided in Section 12801.9, the department shall require an applicant for an original driver’s license or identification card to submit satisfactory proof of California residency and that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(b) Except as provided in Section
 12801.9, the department shall not issue an original driver’s license or identification card to a person who does not submit satisfactory proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(c) The department shall not issue an original driver’s license or identification card to a person who does not submit satisfactory proof of California residency.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, procedures for (1) verifying that the applicant is a California resident and that his or her presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, (2) issuance of a temporary license pending verification of the applicant’s status, and (3) hearings to appeal a denial of a license, temporary license, or identification card.

(e) On January 10 of each year, the department shall submit a supplemental budget report to the Governor and the Legislature detailing the costs of verifying the citizenship or legal residency of applicants for driver’s licenses and identification cards, in order for the state to request reimbursement from the federal government.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 40300 or any other law, a peace officer shall not detain or arrest a person solely on the belief that the person is an unlicensed driver, unless the officer has reasonable cause to believe the person driving is under 16 years of age.

(g) The inability of an individual to obtain a driver’s license pursuant to this section does not abrogate or diminish in any respect the legal requirement of every driver in this state to obey the motor vehicle laws of this state, including laws with respect to licensing, motor
 vehicle registration, and financial responsibility.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   (AB 1465)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Pursuant to subd. (h), this version becomes operative on July 1, 2016, only if a judicial determination as described in subd. (i) has not taken effect.   Pursuant to subd. (i), this version becomes inoperative on the effective date of a judicial determination as described. On that date, see the later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall require an applicant for an original driver’s license or identification card to submit satisfactory proof of California residency and that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(b) The department shall not issue an original driver’s license or identification card to a person who
 does not submit satisfactory proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(c) The department shall not issue an original driver’s license or identification card to a person who does not submit satisfactory proof of California residency.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, procedures for (1) verifying that the applicant is a California resident and that his or her presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, (2) issuance of a temporary license pending verification of the applicant’s status, and (3) hearings to appeal a denial of a license, temporary license, or identification card.

(e) On January 10 of each year, the department shall submit a supplemental budget report to the
 Governor and the Legislature detailing the costs of verifying the citizenship or legal residency of applicants for driver’s licenses and identification cards, in order for the state to request reimbursement from the federal government.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 40300 or any other law, a peace officer shall not detain or arrest a person solely on the belief that the person is an unlicensed driver, unless the officer has reasonable cause to believe the person driving is under 16 years of age.

(g) The inability of an individual to obtain a driver’s license pursuant to this section does not abrogate or diminish in any respect the legal requirement of every driver in this state to obey the motor vehicle laws of this state, including laws with respect to licensing, motor vehicle registration, and financial responsibility.

(h) This section shall become operative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its Internet Web site.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 708, Sec. 4.   (AB 1465)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Pursuant to subd. (h), this version becomes operative on the effective date of a judicial determination as described, but not sooner than July 1, 2016, pursuant to subds. (g) and (h) in the amendment by Sec. 3 of Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.6.

(a) Any federal document demonstrating favorable action by the federal government for acceptance of a person into the deferred action for childhood arrivals program shall satisfy the requirements of Section 12801.5.

(b) The department may issue an original driver’s license to the person who submits proof of presence in the United States as
 authorized under federal law pursuant to subdivision (a) and either a social security account number or ineligibility for a social security account number.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 862, Sec. 3.   (AB 2189)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.7.

(a) The department shall not issue an original driver’s license or identification card, or a renewal, duplicate, or replacement driver’s license or identification card to any person for whom the department has received notice from the United States Department of Homeland Security that the person has been determined and found by the United States Department of Homeland Security to be a deported person under Section 1252 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) The department shall cancel any driver’s license or identification card issued to any person identified as specified in subdivision (a).

(2) The cancellation shall become effective on the 30th day after the date the cancellation notice is mailed to the person, except as authorized under paragraph (3).

(3) The person may request a review of the intended cancellation during the 30-day period specified in paragraph (2) and, if proof is provided to show the person is legally present in the United States as authorized under federal law, the department shall rescind the cancellation.

(4) The cancellation notice shall be mailed to the person’s last known address.

(c) The department shall require an applicant for a driver’s license whose license was canceled under this section to submit satisfactory
 proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(d) This section shall become operative on, and apply only to persons determined and found to be a deported person who is not a citizen or national of the United States after, July 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 61.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.8.

(a) In the case of a legal, nonimmigrant driver’s license applicant, the department shall issue a temporary driver’s license, valid for 90 days, if the applicant has successfully completed the application and the related requirements for the issuance of a driver’s license under this code, including paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 12805. If the United States Department of Homeland Security is
 unable to verify the applicant’s presence before the temporary driver’s license expires, the department shall, at least 15 days before the temporary driver’s license expires, extend the temporary driver’s license for an additional 120 days and notify the applicant by mail that the temporary driver’s license is being extended.

(b) If the department adjusts the expiration date of any driver’s license issued pursuant to this code so that the date does not exceed the expiration date of a federal document submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12801.5, the applicant may, upon receipt of a notice of renewal of the driver’s license by the department sent prior to the expiration of the license, request an extension of the term of the driver’s license by submitting to the department satisfactory proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States has been reauthorized or extended under federal law. After verifying that the applicant’s
 presence in the United States has been reauthorized or extended by federal law, the department shall adjust the expiration date of the driver’s license so that it does not exceed the expiration date of the revised federal document submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12801.5 and complies with the related requirements of this code.

(c) The department shall establish a procedure for receiving mailed requests for the extension of driver’s licenses as described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 339, Sec. 8.   (SB 838)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.9.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 12801.5, the department shall issue an original driver’s license to a person who is unable to submit satisfactory proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law if the person meets all other qualifications for licensure and provides satisfactory proof to the department of the person’s identity and California residency.
